Hawaii statutes.
§602-9 Sessions, where. The supreme
court shall sit in Honolulu; provided that the chief justice may appoint a
different place for the sitting of the court, pro tempore. [L 1892, c 57, §55;
am L 1901, c 22, §2; RL 1925, §2228; RL 1935, §3597; RL 1945, §9608; RL 1955,
§214-8; HRS §602-9; am L 1972, c 88, §2(e); ree L 1979, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next